Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-39] Reimbursement for state
contributions. (a) All state agencies having control of funds other than
the general fund shall reimburse the State for contributions made by the State
pursuant to sections 87A-32, 87A-33, 87A-34, 87A-35, 87A-36, and 87A-37 on
account of agency employees whose compensation is paid in whole or part from
funds other than the general fund.

(b) All state and county agencies receiving
federal funds, which may be expended for the purpose of replacing the
contributions payable by the State to the fund, shall set aside a portion of
the federal funds sufficient to reimburse the State for contributions made by
the State pursuant to sections 87A-32, 87A-33, 87A-34, 87A-35, 87A-36, and
87A-37, on account of the employees in the agencies whose compensation is paid
in whole or part from federal funds. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next